Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.125

Duty to identify employees whose performance warrants termination from employment.

It is the responsibility of each agency head to institute management procedures designed to identify any agency employee, either supervisory or nonsupervisory, whose performance is so inadequate as to warrant termination from state employment. In addition, it is the responsibility of each agency head to remove from a supervisory position any supervisor within the agency who has tolerated the continued employment of any employee under his or her supervision whose performance has warranted termination from state employment.

[ 1985 c 461 s 15.]

NOTES:

Severability—1985 c 461: See note following RCW 41.06.020.

Adoption of rules to remove supervisors tolerating inadequate employees: RCW 41.06.196.